Utah statutes.
31A-9-601.   Tax exemption.

Every domestic and nondomestic fraternal is exempt from all state, county, district, municipal, and school taxes or fees, except the fees required under Section 31A-3-103, and all the taxes and special assessments on its real estate and office equipment.

